New York, session 2025-2026, S3266.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 2 village of Southampton is hereby authorized to designate emergency 3 response and rescue vehicles assigned to the Southampton village ocean 4 rescue as authorized emergency vehicles pursuant to section 101 of the 5 vehicle and traffic law. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07544-01-5